California statutes. Public Resources Code
(3) The lead applicant agency complies with all legal requirements for the project, including the requirements of the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000)).

(4) There are moneys designated for the program that are sufficient to make the reimbursement payment.

(c) The lead applicant agency and the commission shall enter into an agreement governing reimbursement as described in this section. The timing and final amount of reimbursement is dependent on the terms of the agreement and the availability of moneys
 for the program.

(d) The commission, in consultation with intercity, commuter, urban rail, and other public transit entities, may develop guidelines to implement this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 255, Sec. 4.   (AB 135)   Effective September 16, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

75226.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, moneys appropriated to the Transportation Agency in the annual Budget Act from the General Fund and the Greenhouse Gas Reduction Fund for purposes of the Transit and Intercity Rail Capital Program shall not be distributed pursuant to a program of projects adopted pursuant to Section 75222 and allocated by the California Transportation Commission pursuant to Section 75220.

(b) The moneys described in subdivision (a) shall
 instead be distributed to regional transportation planning agencies pursuant to Section 99313 of the Public Utilities Code and the distribution of those moneys shall be subject to the requirements of Section 13987 of the Government Code and the guidelines adopted pursuant to that section.

(c) Subject to compliance with Section 13987 of the Government Code, a regional transportation planning agency may use moneys described in subdivision (a) to fund transit operating expenses within its jurisdiction consistent with an approved regional short-term financial plan or a long-term financial plan, as applicable, or for transformative capital improvements described in Sections 75220 and 75221, or for both of these purposes.

(d) In allowing the funds described in subdivision (a) to be available for operating costs, it is the intent of the Legislature for those expenditures to do all of the
 following:

(1) Provide one-time multiyear bridge funding for transit operators to address operational costs until long-term transit sustainability solutions are identified.

(2) Assist transit operators in preventing service cuts and increasing ridership.

(3) Prioritize the availability of transit for riders who are transit dependent.

(4) Prioritize transit agencies representing a significant percentage of the region’s ridership.

(e) For purposes of this section, “regional transportation planning agency” means a recipient of funding described in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 99312.1 of the Public Utilities Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 53, Sec. 6.   (AB 173)   Effective July 2, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

75227.

(a) This section shall apply notwithstanding any other law.

(b) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Public transit operating purposes” includes, but is not limited to, costs necessary to avoid or mitigate service reductions and costs to maintain or restore existing transit service levels for bus, rail, and other public transportation services. “Public transit operating purposes” does not include capital construction costs or any other capital expenses.

(2) “Region” means the region described in Section 66502 of the Government Code.

(3) “Specified transit entities” means the San Francisco Bay Area Rapid Transit District, the San Francisco Municipal Transportation Agency, the Peninsula Corridor Joint Powers Board, and the Alameda-Contra Costa Transit District.

(c) On or before July 1, 2026, the Transportation Agency shall loan to the Metropolitan Transportation Commission up to five hundred ninety million dollars ($590,000,000) of funding approved under the Transit and Intercity Rail Capital Program for projects within the region. The Metropolitan Transportation Commission shall use the proceeds of the loan described in this section to offer loans to the specified transit entities for public transit operating purposes. The loan to the Metropolitan Transportation Commission shall be subject to all of the following:

(1) The loan is limited to being comprised of funding awarded to projects within the
 region that, as of December 31, 2025, have not been fully allocated funding by the California Transportation Commission.

(2) The loan shall be repaid in quarterly installments by the Metropolitan Transportation Commission to the Transportation Agency over a period of 12 years calculated from the original loan issue date, subject to all of the following:

(A) The first two years of the loan repayment period shall consist of interest-only quarterly payments.

(B) After two years from the original loan issue date, repayment shall consist of quarterly payments based on an amortization schedule factoring in full repayment of both outstanding interest and principal amounts over the remaining loan term.

(C) The rate of interest applied to a loan made pursuant to
 this section shall be the same rate earned on investments in the Surplus Money Investment Fund during the loan repayment period.

(3) The Metropolitan Transportation Commission shall determine the terms and conditions of loans made to the specified transit entities, including, but not limited to, the principal amount, and any conditions before disbursement, consistent with the requirements of subparagraphs (A), (B), and (C) of paragraph (2).

(d) (1) The Metropolitan Transportation Commission shall secure repayment of any loan issued by the Transportation Agency pursuant to this section by pledging and assigning, as security of last resort for the loan, the State Transit Assistance Program revenues received by the specified transit entities that would otherwise be administered by the Metropolitan Transportation Commission pursuant to Section 99314 of the Public
 Utilities Code. The loan agreement shall be signed by a representative of the Transportation Agency and the Metropolitan Transportation Commission and shall specify the pledged amount or method of calculation and the period during which the pledge applies. The signatories to the loan agreement may bind their respective agencies, as established by each agency’s respective procedures and any necessary supporting actions to confer that authority.

(2) The California Transportation Commission shall monitor and report to the Transportation Agency on the unallocated and unexpended balances of the region’s project awards for the Transit and Intercity Rail Capital Program. If the total awarded but unallocated funds to projects in the region less any outstanding loan balances falls below three hundred fifty million dollars ($350,000,000), the California Transportation Commission shall do both of the following:

(A) Notify the Transportation Agency and Metropolitan Transportation Commission.

(B) In consultation with the Transportation Agency, evaluate information provided by the Metropolitan Transportation Commission and project sponsors in the region regarding their unallocated and unexpended balances of the region’s projects in the Transit and Intercity Rail Capital Program to determine whether there is risk to California Transportation Commission’s ability to meet the region’s anticipated allocation requests and project cash flow requirements over the next two years. If the California Transportation Commission, in consultation with the Transportation Agency, determines it to be necessary, the California Transportation Commission, in consultation with the Transportation Agency, shall establish an allocation plan for the region’s awarded projects, in coordination with the region’s Transit and
 Intercity Rail Capital Program project sponsors and the Metropolitan Transportation Commission. The allocation plan shall be for projects in the region seeking allocation and the plan may adjust or defer future allocations during the period of repayment of the loan made to the Metropolitan Transportation Commission pursuant to subdivision (c).

(3) If an allocation plan established pursuant to paragraph (2) results in a material impact to a project in the region, as determined by the California Transportation Commission and the Transportation Agency, the Metropolitan Transportation Commission, in coordination with the Transportation Agency, may prioritize the use of existing sources of funds allocated by the state to the region so that the project is not materially impacted with regard to scope, schedule, and eligibility for nonstate funding. If state-allocated fund sources provided to the region are used for this circumstance, the
 Transportation Agency may return funds to the Metropolitan Transportation Commission from the loan repayments made pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) equal to the state-allocated fund sources provided to the region that are committed to the affected project.

(e) A specified transit entity shall use its respective share of funding under the State Transit Assistance Program pursuant to Section 99314 of the Public Utilities Code as security for any loan made by the Metropolitan Transportation Commission pursuant to this section and those funds may be redirected by the Metropolitan Transportation Commission as repayment for any outstanding loan if the specified transit entity fails to make timely loan payments.

(f) (1) Subdivisions (a) to (e), inclusive, shall become inoperative upon full repayment of the loan by the Metropolitan Transportation
 Commission, as determined by the Transportation Agency in consultation with the Department of Finance.

(2) Upon the determination made in paragraph (1), notwithstanding Section 9795 of the Government Code or any other law, the Transportation Agency shall notify the Joint Legislative Budget Committee of this fact. This section shall be repealed on January 1 following the notification provided to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee.

(g) The Legislature finds and declares that this section is related to Section 91.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 (Chapters 4, 5, and 104 of the Statutes of 2025).

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 6, Sec. 1.   (AB 117)   Effective February 19, 2026.   Conditionally repealed on date prescribed by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 3. Low Carbon Transit Operations Program  [75230. - 75231.]

75230.

(a) The Low Carbon Transit Operations Program is hereby created to provide operating and capital assistance for transit agencies to reduce the emissions of greenhouse gases and improve mobility, with a priority on serving disadvantaged communities.

(b) Funding for the program is continuously appropriated pursuant to Section 39719.4 of the Health and Safety Code from the Greenhouse Gas Reduction Fund established pursuant to Section 16428.8 of the Government Code. The Department of Transportation may provide administrative support for the program.

(c) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), funding shall be allocated by the Controller on a formula basis consistent with the
 requirements of this part, upon a determination by the Department of Transportation that the expenditures proposed by a recipient transit agency meet the requirements of this part and guidelines developed pursuant to this section, and that the amount of funding requested is currently available.

(2) For the portion of funding allocated pursuant to paragraph (1) under the formula set forth in Section 99314 of the Public Utilities Code, the Controller shall allocate that funding for the 2019–20 to 2025–26, inclusive, fiscal years based on the individual operator ratios described in Section 99314.10 of the Public Utilities Code.

(d) A recipient transit agency shall demonstrate that each expenditure of program moneys allocated to the agency reduces the emissions of greenhouse gases.

(e) A recipient transit agency shall
 demonstrate that each expenditure of program moneys does not supplant another source of funds.

(f) Moneys for the program shall be expended to provide transit operating or capital assistance that meets any of the following:

(1) Expenditures that directly enhance or expand transit service by supporting new or expanded bus or rail services, new or expanded waterborne transit, or expanded intermodal transit facilities, and may include equipment acquisition, fueling, and maintenance, and other costs to operate those services or facilities.

(2) Operational expenditures that increase transit mode share.

(3) Expenditures related to the purchase of zero-emission buses, including electric buses, and the installation of the necessary equipment and infrastructure
 to operate and support these zero-emission buses.

(g) (1) For a recipient transit agency whose service area includes disadvantaged communities, as identified pursuant to Section 39711 of the Health and Safety Code, at least 50 percent of the total moneys received pursuant to this part shall be expended on projects or services that meet the requirements of subdivisions (d), (e), and (f) and benefit the disadvantaged communities, as identified consistent with the guidance developed by the State Air Resources Board pursuant to Section 39715 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) The requirement of paragraph (1) is waived if the recipient transit agency expends the funding provided pursuant to this section on any of the following:

(A) New or expanded transit service that connects with transit service
 serving disadvantaged communities, as identified pursuant to Section 39711 of, or in low-income communities, as defined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 39713 of, the Health and Safety Code.

(B) Transit fare subsidies and network and fare integration technology improvements, including, but not limited to, discounted or free student transit passes.

(C) The purchase of zero-emission transit buses and supporting infrastructure.

(3) Expenditures made pursuant to paragraph (2) shall be deemed to have met all applicable requirements established pursuant to Section 39713 of the Health and Safety Code.

(4) This section does not require a recipient transit agency to provide individual rider data to the Department of Transportation or to the State
 Air Resources Board.

(h) The Department of Transportation, in coordination with the State Air Resources Board, shall develop guidelines that describe the methodologies that a recipient transit agency shall use to demonstrate that proposed expenditures will meet the criteria in subdivisions (d), (e), (f), and (g) and establish the reporting requirements for documenting ongoing compliance with those criteria.

(i) Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code does not apply to the development of guidelines for the program pursuant to this section.

(j) A recipient transit agency shall submit the following information to the Department of Transportation before seeking a disbursement of funds pursuant to this part:

(1) A list of proposed expense types for anticipated funding levels.

(2) The documentation required by the guidelines developed pursuant to this section to demonstrate compliance with subdivisions (d), (e), (f), and (g).

(k) For capital projects, a recipient transit agency shall also do all of the following:

(1) Specify the phases of work for which the recipient transit agency is seeking an allocation of moneys from the program.

(2) Identify the sources and timing of all moneys required to undertake and complete any phase of a project for which the recipient transit agency is seeking an allocation of moneys from the program.

(3) Describe intended sources and timing of funding
 to complete any subsequent phases of the project, through construction or procurement.

(l) Except as specified in subdivision (m), a recipient transit agency that has used program moneys for any type of operational assistance allowed by subdivision (f) in a previous fiscal year may use program moneys to continue the same service or program in any subsequent fiscal year if the agency can demonstrate that reductions in the emissions of greenhouse gases can be realized.

(m) A recipient transit agency using program moneys for the continuation of a free or reduced fare transit program shall not be subject to subdivision (l) and may continue to use program moneys for that purpose without any restriction to length of time. The recipient transit agency shall submit an initial allocation request to the department and meet all requirements of this section, except subdivision (l).
 After the initial allocation for a recipient transit agency’s free or reduced fare transit program is funded pursuant to this subdivision, the recipient transit agency shall not be required to submit an additional allocation request for the next three fiscal years, but instead shall provide documentation necessary to meet the requirements of subdivision (s) and for the free or reduced fare transit program to maintain compliance with this section as detailed in the initial allocation request submitted to the department. A recipient transit agency using funds for a free or reduced fare transit program funded pursuant to this subdivision shall submit the reports required by subdivision (s).

(n) Before authorizing the disbursement of funds, the Department of Transportation, in coordination with the State Air Resources Board, shall determine the eligibility, in whole or in part, of the proposed list of expense types, based on the documentation
 provided by a recipient transit agency to ensure ongoing compliance with the guidelines developed pursuant to this section.

(o) The Department of Transportation shall notify the Controller of approved expenditures for each recipient transit agency, and the amount of the allocation for each agency determined to be available at that time of approval.

(p) A recipient transit agency that does not submit an expenditure for funding in a particular fiscal year may retain its funding share, and may accumulate and use that funding share in a subsequent fiscal year for a larger expenditure, including operating assistance. The recipient transit agency shall first specify the number of fiscal years that it intends to retain its funding share and the expenditure for which the agency intends to use these moneys. A recipient transit agency may only retain its funding share for a maximum of four
 fiscal years.

(q) A recipient transit agency may, in any particular fiscal year, loan or transfer its funding share to another recipient transit agency within the same region for any identified eligible expenditure under the program, including operating assistance, in accordance with procedures incorporated by the Department of Transportation in the guidelines developed pursuant to this section, which procedures shall be consistent with the requirement in subdivision (g).

(r) A recipient transit agency may apply to the Department of Transportation to reassign any savings of surplus moneys allocated under this section to the agency for an expenditure that has been completed to another eligible expenditure under the program, including operating assistance. A recipient transit agency may also apply to the Department of Transportation to reassign to another eligible expenditure any
 moneys from the program previously allocated to the agency for an expenditure that the agency has determined is no longer a priority for the use of those moneys.

(s) A recipient transit agency shall provide annual reports to the Department of Transportation, in the format and manner prescribed by the department, consistent with the internal administrative procedures for the use of the fund proceeds developed by the State Air Resources Board.

(t) The Department of Transportation and recipient transit agencies shall comply with the guidelines developed by the State Air Resources Board pursuant to Section 39715 of the Health and Safety Code to ensure that the requirements of Section 39713 of the Health and Safety Code are met to maximize the benefits to disadvantaged communities, as identified pursuant to Section 39711 of the Health and Safety Code.

(u) A recipient transit agency shall comply with all applicable legal requirements, including the requirements of the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000)), and civil rights and environmental justice obligations under state and federal law. This section does not expand or extend the applicability of those laws to recipient transit agencies.

(v) The audit of public transportation operator finances already required under the Mills-Alquist-Deddeh Act (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 99200) of Part 11 of Division 10 of the Public Utilities Code) pursuant to Section 99245 of the Public Utilities Code shall be expanded to include verification of receipt and appropriate expenditure of moneys from the program. Each recipient transit agency receiving moneys from the program in a fiscal year for which an audit is conducted shall transmit a copy
 of the audit to the Department of Transportation, and the department shall make the audits available to the Legislature and the Controller for review on request.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 259, Sec. 9.   (SB 193)   Effective September 18, 2026.   Superseded January 1, 2027; see amendment by Stats. 2026, Ch. 259.)
-------------------------------------------

75230.

(a) The Low Carbon Transit Operations Program is hereby created to provide operating and capital assistance for transit agencies to reduce the emissions of greenhouse gases and improve mobility, with a priority on serving disadvantaged communities.

(b) Funding for the program is continuously appropriated pursuant to Section 39719.4 of the Health and Safety Code from the Greenhouse Gas Reduction Fund established pursuant to Section 16428.8 of the Government Code. The department may provide administrative support for the program.

(c) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), funding shall be allocated by the Controller on a formula basis consistent with the requirements of this part,
 upon a determination by the department that the expenditures proposed by a recipient transit agency meet the requirements of this part and guidelines developed pursuant to this section, and that the amount of funding requested is currently available.

(2) For the portion of funding allocated pursuant to paragraph (1) under the formula set forth in Section 99314 of the Public Utilities Code, the Controller shall allocate that funding for the 2019–20 to 2025–26, inclusive, fiscal years based on the individual operator ratios described in Section 99314.10 of the Public Utilities Code.

(d) (1) Program funds shall be expended only on the following services and programs:

(A) Maintenance or expansion of bus, rail, or ferry services, including, but not limited to, equipment acquisition, vehicles,
 fueling, maintenance, and other costs to operate bus, rail, and ferry services. The expenditure of program funds on buses shall be in accordance with the State Air Resources Board’s Innovative Clean Transit Regulations (Article 4.3 (commencing with Section 2023) of Chapter 1 of Division 3 of Title 13 of the California Code of Regulations).

(B) Transit fare subsidies, including, but not limited to, discounted and free student transit passes.

(C) Network and fare integration technology improvements.

(2) An expenditure made pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be deemed to reduce greenhouse gas emissions.

(e) (1) For a recipient transit agency whose service area includes disadvantaged communities, as identified pursuant to Section 39711 of
 the Health and Safety Code, at least 50 percent of the total moneys received pursuant to this part shall be expended on projects or services that meet the requirements of subdivision (d) and benefit the disadvantaged communities, as identified consistent with the guidance developed by the State Air Resources Board pursuant to Section 39715 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) The requirement of paragraph (1) is waived if the recipient transit agency expends the funding provided pursuant to this section on any of the following:

(A) New or expanded transit service that connects with transit service that serves disadvantaged communities, as identified pursuant to Section 39711 of the Health and Safety Code, or in low-income communities, as defined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 39713 of the Health and Safety Code.

(B) Transit fare subsidies and network and fare integration technology improvements, including, but not limited to, discounted or free student transit passes.

(C) The purchase of zero-emission transit buses and supporting infrastructure.

(3) Expenditures made pursuant to paragraph (2) shall be deemed to have met all applicable requirements established pursuant to Section 39713 of the Health and Safety Code.

(4) This section does not require a recipient transit agency to provide individual rider data to the Department of Transportation or to the State Air Resources Board.

(f) (1) Before receiving an allocation of funds pursuant to subdivision (c) from the Controller in a fiscal year, a recipient transit agency shall
 submit to the department a list of services or programs proposed to be funded with the funds. The list of services or programs proposed to be funded by the program may be for a single year or for multiple years. The list of services or programs proposed to be funded with the funds shall include a description and location of each proposed service or program. The list of services or programs submitted to the department shall not limit the flexibility of a recipient transit agency to fund services or programs in accordance with local needs and priorities if the services or programs are consistent with subdivision (d).

(2) The department shall report to the Controller a recipient transit agency that has submitted a list of services or programs as described in this subdivision and that is therefore eligible to receive an allocation of funds for the applicable fiscal year. The Controller, upon receipt of the report, shall allocate funds consistent
 with subdivision (c).

(g) For each fiscal year, a recipient transit agency receiving an allocation of funds pursuant to subdivision (f) shall, upon expending those funds, submit documentation to the department that includes a description and location of each completed service or program, and the amount of funds expended on the service or program.

(h) A recipient transit agency that has used program moneys for any type of service or program allowed by subdivision (d) in a previous fiscal year may use program moneys to continue the same service or program in a subsequent fiscal year.

(i) A recipient transit agency that does not submit a list pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (f) in a particular fiscal year may retain its funding share, and may accumulate and use that funding share in a subsequent fiscal year for
 a larger expenditure. The recipient transit agency shall first specify the number of fiscal years that it intends to retain its funding share and the program or service for which the agency intends to use these moneys. A recipient transit agency may only retain its funding share for a maximum of four fiscal years.

(j) A recipient transit agency may, in any particular fiscal year, loan or transfer its funding share to another recipient transit agency within the same region for any identified eligible program or service under the program, in accordance with procedures developed and adopted by the department.

(k) A recipient transit agency may apply to the department to reassign any savings of surplus moneys allocated under this section to the agency for a program or service that has been completed to another eligible program or service under the program. A recipient transit agency
 may also apply to the department to reassign to another eligible program or service any moneys from the program previously allocated to the agency for a program or service that the agency has determined is no longer a priority for the use of those moneys.

(l) A recipient transit agency shall comply with all applicable legal requirements, including the requirements of the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000)), and civil rights and environmental justice obligations under state and federal law. This section does not expand or extend the applicability of those laws to recipient transit agencies.

(m) The audit of public transportation operator finances already required under the Mills-Alquist-Deddeh Act (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 99200) of Part 11 of Division 10 of the Public Utilities Code) pursuant to Section 99245 of the Public
 Utilities Code shall be expanded to include verification of receipt and appropriate expenditure of moneys from the program. Each recipient transit agency receiving moneys from the program in a fiscal year for which an audit is conducted shall transmit a copy of the audit to the department, and the department shall make the audits available to the Legislature and the Controller for review on request.

(n) Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code does not apply to the development of guidelines or procedures for the program pursuant to this section.

(o) For purposes of this section, “department” means the Department of Transportation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 259, Sec. 9.5.   (SB 193)   Effective September 18, 2026.   Operative January 1, 2027, pursuant to Sec. 13 of Stats. 2026, Ch. 259.)
-------------------------------------------

75231.

(a) A recipient transit agency under the program created pursuant to Section 75230 may apply to the Department of Transportation for a letter of no prejudice for any eligible expenditures under the program, including operating assistance, for which the department has authorized a disbursement of funds. If approved by the department, the letter of no prejudice shall allow the recipient transit agency to expend its own moneys for the expenditures and to be eligible for future reimbursement from moneys available for the program.

(b) The amount expended under subdivision (a) shall be reimbursed by the state from moneys available for the program if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The
 expenditures for which the letter of no prejudice was requested have commenced, and any regional or local expenditures, if applicable, have been incurred.

(2) The expenditures made by the recipient transit agency are eligible under the program. If expenditures made by the recipient transit agency are determined to be ineligible, the state has no obligation to reimburse those expenditures.

(3) The recipient transit agency complies with all applicable legal requirements for the expenditures, including the requirements of the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000)), and civil rights and environmental justice obligations under state and federal law. Nothing in this section shall be construed to expand or extend the applicability of those laws to recipient transit agencies.

(4) There are moneys in the Greenhouse Gas Reduction Fund designated for the program and from the recipient transit agency’s formula allocation share as determined pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 39719 of, or subparagraph (D) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 39719.4 of, the Health and Safety Code that are sufficient to make the reimbursement payment.

(c) The recipient transit agency and the Department of Transportation shall enter into an agreement governing reimbursement as described in this section. The timing and final amount of reimbursement shall be dependent on the terms of the agreement and the availability of moneys in the Greenhouse Gas Reduction Fund for the program.

(d) The Department of Transportation, in consultation with recipient public transit agencies, may develop guidelines to implement this
 section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 259, Sec. 10.   (SB 193)   Effective September 18, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 4. Transformative Climate Communities Program [75240. - 75244.]

75240.

The Transformative Climate Communities Program is hereby created, to be administered by the Strategic Growth Council. The program shall fund the development and implementation of neighborhood-level transformative climate community plans that include multiple, coordinated greenhouse gas emissions reduction projects that provide local economic, environmental, and health benefits to disadvantaged communities, as described in Section 39711 of the Health and Safety Code. By making such comprehensive public investments, it is the intent of the Legislature that private resources can be more effectively catalyzed to support innovative community and climate transformation in disadvantaged communities.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 371, Sec. 1.   (AB 2722)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

75241.

(a) The Strategic Growth Council shall award competitive grants to eligible entities through an application process. An eligible entity, including, but not limited to, a nonprofit organization, a community-based organization, a faith-based organization, a coalition or association of nonprofit organizations, a community development finance institution, a community development corporation, a local agency, a joint powers authority, or a tribal government, shall demonstrate multistakeholder partnerships with local agencies, community-based organizations, labor groups, workforce investment boards, and other stakeholders, as appropriate. The Strategic Growth Council shall award grants for projects that demonstrate community engagement in all phases.

(b) (1) In awarding grants, the Strategic Growth Council shall make grant selections for plan development contingent on the implementation of one or more projects identified by the plan.

(2) In awarding grants, the Strategic Growth Council may give priority to plans and projects that cover areas that have a high proportion of census tracts identified as disadvantaged communities and that focus on communities that are most disadvantaged.

(3) The Strategic Growth Council may award a grant over multiple years.

(4) The Strategic Growth Council shall consider applicants for projects undertaken in disadvantaged communities located in unincorporated areas of a county.

(c) To be eligible for funding under the program, a plan, and a project that
 implements a plan, shall demonstrate that it will achieve a reduction in emissions of greenhouse gases.

(d) The California Environmental Protection Agency shall provide assistance in performing outreach to disadvantaged communities and assessing the environmental justice benefits of project awards.

(e) Projects shall maximize climate, public health, environmental, workforce, and economic benefits.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 370, Sec. 244.   (SB 1371)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

75242.

(a) The council and all funded entities shall endeavor to identify additional public and private sources of funding to sustain and expand the program.

(b) The council shall fund technical assistance providers to assist in application development and project development and implementation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 371, Sec. 1.   (AB 2722)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

75243.

(a) Before awarding funds under the program, the council shall develop guidelines and selection criteria for plan development and implementation of the program.

(b) In adopting guidelines and selection criteria, the council shall consider comments, if any, from local governments, regional agencies, and other stakeholders. The council shall conduct outreach to disadvantaged communities to encourage comments on the draft guidelines and selection criteria from those communities.

(c) In adopting the guidelines, the council shall consider whether eligible plans and projects avoid economic
 displacement of low-income disadvantaged community residents and businesses.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 371, Sec. 1.   (AB 2722)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

75244.

For notices of funding availability released after July 1, 2021, in awarding funds under the program, the council shall provide additional points or preference to jurisdictions that have adopted a housing element that has been found by the Department of Housing and Community Development to be in substantial compliance with the requirements of Article 10.6 (commencing with Section 65580) of Chapter 3 of Division 1 of Title 7 of the Government Code pursuant to Section 65585 of the Government Code and that are designated prohousing pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 65589.9 of the Government Code, in the manner determined by the Department of Housing and Community Development pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 65589.9 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 159, Sec. 22.   (AB 101)   Effective July 31, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 5. Community Resilience Center Program. [75250. - 75250.]

75250.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Council” means the Strategic Growth Council established pursuant to Section 75121.

(2) “Disadvantaged community” means a community identified pursuant to Section 39711 of the Health and Safety Code.

(3) “Disadvantaged unincorporated community” means the same as defined in Section 65302.10 of the Government Code.

(4) “Eligible entities” include, but are not limited to, nonprofit organizations, community-based organizations, coalitions or associations of nonprofit organizations,
 local agencies, or a tribal government.

(5) “Eligible services and amenities” means services and amenities offered by community resilience centers, including, but not limited to, hydration stations, electric charging stations, backup power, public health and mobile health services, cooling, clean air, respite, community evacuation and emergency response, and other services to mitigate the public health impacts of extreme heat and other emergency situations exacerbated by climate change, such as wildfire, poor air quality, power outages, or flooding, on local populations.

(6) “Program” means the Community Resilience Center Program established pursuant to this section.

(7) “Under-resourced community” means the same as defined in Section 71130.

(b) The
 Community Resilience Center Program is hereby established, to be administered by the Strategic Growth Council, in coordination with the Office of Planning and Research, to provide funding for the construction of new, or the retrofitting of existing, facilities that will serve as community resilience centers. Community resilience centers shall serve as community emergency response facilities and aid in building long-term resilience, preparedness, and recovery operations for local communities.

(c) (1) The council shall award competitive grants to eligible entities through an application process. To be eligible for a grant award, eligible entities shall demonstrate that the proposed project has all of the following attributes:

(A) Collaboration with community members that will utilize and benefit from the project.
